Wyoming statutes. Title 30 Mines and Minerals
Article 1. In General

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

53A Am. Jur. 2d Mines and Minerals §§ 167, 172 to 183, 184 to 189, 200 to 214, 255 to 289, 328 to 366.

58 C.J.S. Mines and Minerals §§ 334 to 446.

§ 30-2-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Approved” means any device or practice approved by the inspector;

“Council” means the state mining council which is within the department of workforce services;

“Coal mine” means any mine from which coal is produced for sale, exchange or use;

“Cross entry” means an entry from which room entries are turned;

“Gassy mine” means a mine:

In which methane has been ignited;

In which methane has been found by means of a permissible flame safety lamp or by air analysis in an amount of twenty-five one hundredths of a percent (0.25%) or more; or

Which is contiguous to a gassy mine.

“Inspector” means the state inspector of mines;

“Interested persons” means authorized members of the mine safety committee, state and federal inspectors, and, to the extent required by law, any other person;

“Mine” means underground or surface mines, including coal mines;

“Mine foreman” means the person whom the operator places in charge of the workings of a mine or a portion of a mine and of persons employed therein. He is the official responsible for the health and safety of the employees;

“Mining operations” include the following whether in process or development, construction or operation:

Mines;

Ore mills;

Ore processing plants;

Sampling works;

Smelters;

Metallurgical plants;

Cement manufacturing plants and cement works;

Rock quarries;

Clay pits and mines;

Sand and gravel pits;

Tunnels and tunneling;

Excavations or removal of earth for commercial or industrial purposes;

All other processes or operations in which mineral materials in solid form are extracted or processed within Wyoming, but excluding mining operations and processes relating to highway and railroad construction and maintenance, other than tunneling, performed directly under the control and supervision of the state department of transportation or a railroad company. The exclusion does not apply to commercial suppliers.

“Nongassy mine” means any mine not classed as a gassy mine;

“Operator” means an individual, firm, partnership, or corporation operating a mine or any part thereof;

“Permissible” means any equipment, device, or explosive that meets the requirements of the MSHA;

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 5, § 2.

“This act” means W.S.

30-2-101

through

30-3-509

;

“MSHA” means the federal mine safety and health administration, department of labor;

“Qualified person” means a person qualified by means of the proper certification issued by the council or by means of training and practical demonstration of ability to the inspector or MSHA;

“Mine site contractor” means a person who has entered into a contract with a mine owner or operator to perform functions traditionally performed by mine personnel.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 85, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 57-447; Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 2; 1957, ch. 160, § 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-36, 30-110, 30-130; Laws 1959, ch. 124, § 1, 1961, ch. 133, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

30-2-102

,

30-3-201

,

30-3-401

; Laws 1981, ch. 135, § 1; 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1993, ch. 88, § 1; 1995, ch. 31, § 1; 1998, ch. 37, § 1; 2003, ch. 5, §§ 1, 2; 2005, ch. 106, § 1; 2012, ch. 1, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added (a)(xviii).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” in (a)(ii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subparagraph (a)(x)(I) or (a)(x)(L) or subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Who is “operator” of coal mine within the meaning of the Federal Coal Mine Safety and Health Act (30 USC § 802(d)), 54 ALR Fed 792.

§ 30-2-102.
Minimum standards.

This act and the rules and regulations adopted under it constitute the body of standards for mining operations in this state. The laws, rules and regulations are intended to constitute minimum standards recognized as necessary for the protection of the public interest and the safety of employees and the general public.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 160, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 30-38; W.S. 1977, §

30-2-104

; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 30-2-101(a)(xv).

§ 30-2-103.
General penalty.

Any person who willfully and knowingly violates any provision of this act or rules and regulations adopted under it for which another penalty has not been specifically provided is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) or by imprisonment of not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 65; 1957, ch. 160, § 24; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-40, 30-109; W.S. 1977, §§

30-2-106

,

30-3-113

; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 30-2-101(a)(xv).

§ 30-2-104.
Restrictions upon visitation.

No person shall enter or remain in any mine, excavation, pit, quarry, mill, or processing plant unless authorized by the owner or operator or by law.

No person other than the owner and operator, his employees and agents, and inspectors shall enter, be permitted to enter or remain in any mine, excavation, pit, quarry, mill, or processing plant unless accompanied by the owner, operator or other authorized person.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 160, § 60; W.S. 1957, § 30-95; W.S. 1977, § 30-2-432; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

§ 30-2-105.
Alcohol or controlled substances and intoxication by either prohibited.

No alcohol or a controlled substance as defined in W.S.

35-7-1014

through

35-7-1022

except a controlled substance in schedule V not requiring a prescription or as prescribed by W.S.

35-7-1030

shall be taken into or permitted within any mine, excavation, pit or quarry, or mill or processing plant. No person believed to be under the influence of alcohol or a controlled substance as defined in W.S.

35-7-1014

through

35-7-1022

except a controlled substance in schedule V not requiring a prescription or as prescribed by W.S.

35-7-1030

shall be allowed to enter or remain in or around any mine, excavation, pit, quarry, or mill or processing plant.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 160, § 52; W.S. 1957, § 30-87; W.S. 1977, § 30-2-424; Laws 1981, ch. 9, § 1; 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

Cross references. —

For controlled substances covered by Schedule V, see §

35-7-1022

.

§ 30-2-106.
Action for damages; injury to person or property; loss of life; exception.

For any injury to person or property occasioned by a violation of or a willful failure to comply with this act, a right of action against the party at fault shall accrue to the party injured for the direct damages sustained thereby. In any case of loss of life, by reason of such a violation or willful failure, a right of action against the party at fault shall accrue to the administrator of the estate of the deceased person for like recovery of damages for the injuries sustained. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the recovery of any lawful damages against the person or company operating a mine if the company is found at fault or to have contributed to any accident by their carelessness. The state shall not be liable for damages under this section.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 80, § 17; R.S. 1899, § 2582; C.S. 1910, § 3526; C.S. 1920, § 4449; R.S. 1931, § 23-129; C.S. 1945, § 57-427; W.S. 1957, § 30-141; W.S. 1977, § 30-3-412; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provisions guaranteeing right of action for injury or death of employee, see art. 9, § 4, art. 10, § 4, and art. 19, § 7, Wyo. Const.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 30-2-101(a)(xv).

Repealing clauses. —

Section 23, ch. 80, Laws 1890-91, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict with that act.

Amount of damages not limited. —

As this section does not expressly provide any limitation upon amount of recovery, but authorizes recovery unlimited as to amount, except by ordinary rules of law as to damages in such cases, and as legislature could not, when this section was first enacted, have limited amount of recovery, the court could not impute to the language used anything less than it naturally imports. Burton v. Union Pac. Coal Co., 18 Wyo. 362, 107 P. 391,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(1910), rehearing denied, 18 Wyo. 395, 112 P. 841 (1911). See art. 10, § 4, Wyo. Const.

Defense of assumption of risk not abolished. —

Statute requiring fencing of machinery at a mine, and providing that a cause of action shall accrue to an injured workman through the master's failure to comply, does not abolish the defense of assumption of risk. Maki v. Union P. Coal Co., 187 F. 389, 1911 U.S. App. LEXIS 4515 (8th Cir. Colo.), cert. denied, 223 U.S. 728, 30 S. Ct. 526, 56 L. Ed. 632, 1911 U.S. LEXIS 1819 (U.S. 1911).

Cited

in

Zancanelli v. Central Coal & Coke Co., 25 Wyo. 511, 173 P. 981,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(1918); Horvath v. Sheridan-Wyoming Coal Co., 58 Wyo. 211, 131 P.2d 315,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1942); Druley v. Houdesheldt, 75 Wyo. 166, 296 P.2d 251 (1956).

§ 30-2-107.
Prohibited acts generally.

No person shall intentionally:

Injure any shaft, lamp, instrument, air course or brattice;

Obstruct or throw open airways;

Carry any pipe, cigar or cigarette, match or fire-producing material or appliance into places worked by safety lamps;

Handle or disturb any part of the mine machinery;

Open and fail to close a door;

Enter any place of a mine against caution;

Disobey any order given in implementing this act;

Commit any act endangering the lives or the health of persons or the security of a mine or machinery.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 80, § 7; R.S. 1899, § 2572; C.S. 1910, § 3516; C.S. 1920, § 4439; Laws 1925, ch. 74, § 1; R.S. 1931 § 23-113; C.S. 1945, § 57-419; W.S. 1957, § 30-137; W.S. 1977, § 30-3-408; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 30-2-101(a)(xv).

§ 30-2-108.
Bathhouses; when required; specifications; requirements as to use; penalty for failure to provide.

A mine owner or operator employing twenty (20) or more miners at any one (1) mine shall provide and maintain in a clean and sanitary condition a bathhouse for the use of the employees if sixty percent (60%) of the employees request it in writing.

The bathhouse shall:

Be convenient to the mine entrance;

Be equipped with:

Sufficient individual lockers, or baskets or hangers;

Benches or seats;

Proper lights, heat, hot and cold water, and shower baths.

Be maintained in good order;

Have sufficient floor space to accommodate the persons using it;

Have concrete, tile or cement flooring in the washroom or bathroom;

Be constructed of noncombustible material;

Have steel lockers not less than twelve (12) inches by twelve (12) inches by forty-eight (48) inches in height, or individual hangers of not less than three (3) hooks with a basket of suitable size, attached to a proper chain or wire rope, placed so wearing apparel, when hung thereon, will not be less than seven (7) feet above the floor of the building, and capable of being locked in that position. Lockers, or baskets or hangers shall be sufficient in number to accommodate the employees using the bathhouse;

Have one (1) shower bath with adequate floor space for every fifteen (15) employees using the bathhouse.

Employees shall:

Furnish their own towels, soap and lock for their lockers, or baskets or hangers;

Exercise control over, and be responsible for, property they leave in their lockers, or baskets or hangers.

A mine owner or operator violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00), nor more than one hundred dollars ($100.00). Each day there is a violation of this section constitutes a separate offense.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 63, §§ 1 to 3; R.S. 1931, §§ 23-177 to 23-179; Laws 1935, ch. 108, § 1; C.S. 1945, §§ 57-701 to 57-703; Laws 1950, Sp. Sess., ch. 19, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-197, 30-198, 30-201; W.S. 1977, §§ 30-3-601, 30-3-602, 30-3-605; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
201.06 (Matthew Bender).